Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Chapter 1 In General

Cross references. —

As to the construction, maintenance and improvement of public airports, aircraft land strips and related facilities, see art. 16, § 11, Wyo. Const.

As to borrowing and issuance of bonds by cities and towns for airports, see §§

15-7-112

through

15-7-114

.

As to airports and highways for defense, see §

19-7-204

.

As to common carriers by air, see chapter 11 of title 37.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tort liability of one renting or loaning aeroplane to another, 4 ALR2d 1306.

Transfers of aircraft operated wholly within state as subject to federal regulation, 9 ALR2d 485.

Air carrier's certificate of convenience and necessity, franchise or permit as subject to transfer or encumbrance, 15 ALR2d 883.

Liability of operator of flight training school to injured trainee, 17 ALR2d 557.

Construction and application of provision of life or accident policy relating to aeronautics, 17 ALR2d 1041.

Joint enterprise rule as applicable to the hiring, lease or bailment of an aeroplane, 18 ALR2d 929.

Air carrier's liability for loss of or damage to passengers' baggage or contents thereof, 25 ALR2d 1352.

Regulation or prohibition of advertising by aircraft, 41 ALR2d 1314.

Liability of air carrier for damages to goods caused by improper loading, 44 ALR2d 993.

Who is member of crew within aeronautics clause of life policy, 45 ALR2d 454.

What constitutes “participation” in aeronautics within provision of life policy relating to aeronautics, 45 ALR2d 462.

Air carrier's liability for passenger injured while boarding or alighting, 61 ALR2d 1113.

Air carrier as private or common carrier, and resulting duties as to passenger's safety, 73 ALR2d 346.

Air carrier's liability for injury or death of passenger due to downdraft, updraft or turbulence, 73 ALR2d 379.

Air carrier's liability for injury to passenger from changes in air pressure, 75 ALR2d 848.

Liability for personal injury or death based on overloading aircraft, 75 ALR2d 868.

Air carrier's liability to one injured or killed by slip or fall at airport, 3 ALR3d 938.

Coverage of aeroplane passenger's trip insurance policy, 29 ALR3d 766.

Liability of air carrier for injury to, or death of, passenger on charter flight, 41 ALR3d 455, 91 ALR Fed 547.

Liability of bailee of airplane for damage thereto, 44 ALR3d 862.

Insurance on aircraft; risks and losses covered, 48 ALR3d 1120.

What constitutes operating, riding in or descending from, aircraft within life or accident policy provisions relating to aeronautics, 88 ALR3d 1064.

Situs of aircraft, rolling stock, and vessels for purposes of property taxation, 3 ALR4th 837.

Strict liability, in absence of statute, for injury or damage occurring on the ground caused by ascent, descent or flight of aircraft, 73 ALR4th 416.

Air carrier's liability for injury from condition of airport premises, 14 ALR5th 662.

Validity, under federal constitution, of preflight procedures used at airports to prevent hijacking, 14 ALR Fed 286.

Validity and construction of National Motor Vehicle Theft Act; inclusion of aircraft, 15 ALR Fed 919.

Limitation of liability of air carrier for personal injury or death, 91 ALR Fed 547.

2A C.J.S. Aeronautics and Aerospace § 1 et seq.

§ 10-1-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Aircraft” means any contrivance used, or designed for navigation or flight in the air, except a parachute or other contrivance designed for this navigation but used primarily as safety equipment;

“Airman” means any individual, including the individual in command and any pilot, mechanic or member of the crew, who engages in the navigation of aircraft while under way, and any individual who is in charge of the inspection, overhauling or repairing of aircraft;

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 207, § 2.

“Commission” means the Wyoming aeronautics commission;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Aeronautics commission” means the aeronautics commission created by W.S.

10-3-101

;

“Division” means the division of aeronautics within the department of transportation;

“Person” means individuals, associations of individuals, firms, partnerships, companies, corporations and other organizations;

“Operator” means a person operating or flying an unmanned aircraft;

“Unmanned aircraft” means as defined in 14 C.F.R. 1.1, but excludes “small unmanned aircraft” as defined in 14 C.F.R. 1.1;

“Vertical takeoff and landing aircraft” means a piloted or autonomous aircraft or unmanned aircraft capable of vertical takeoff, vertical landing and transfer to forward motion, excluding rotorcraft;

“This act” means W.S.

10-1-101

through

10-7-105

.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 106, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 4-102; C.S. 1945, § 33-102; Laws 1957, ch. 182, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 10-1, 10-28; W.S. 1977, §§ 10-1-102,

10-3-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2005, ch. 207, § 2; 2017 ch. 170, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2018 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 124, § 3, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, repealed former (a)(iii), defining “air taxi.”

The 2017 amendment

, in added (a)(ix) and (a)(x) and redesignated former (ix) as present (xi).

Laws 2017, ch. 170, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first
2018 amendment, by ch. 104, § 1, added (a)(xi) and redesignated former (xi) as (a)(xii).

Laws 2018, ch. 104, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

The second
2018 amendment, by ch. 124, § 3, in (a)(xi), substituted “10-7-105” for “10-6-104.”

Laws 2018, ch. 124, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.